Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

Litter Prevention and Control Law

4-7-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Litter Prevention and Control Law.”

Acts 1988, ch. 1007, § 1.

Cross-References. Litter control, title 39, ch. 14, part 5.

4-7-302. Creation of special unit.

There is created within the Tennessee highway patrol a special unit for the enforcement of the Litter Control Law, compiled in title 39, chapter 14, part 5. The unit shall consist of a minimum of eight (8) members of the highway patrol. Such members shall be stationed in equal numbers in the eight (8) highway patrol districts.

Sections 4-7-102, 4-7-103, 4-7-107 — 4-7-112, and 4-7-201 — 4-7-208 shall apply to the members authorized in subsection (a).

Acts 1988, ch. 1007, § 2; 1996, ch. 675, § 4.

4-7-303. Jurisdiction, authority and duty.

The members of the special unit created by this part have jurisdiction and authority, and it is their duty, to enforce the Litter Control Law, compiled in title 39, chapter 14, part 5. Such jurisdiction shall include all public roads, highways, rights-of-way, waters and property.

Acts 1988, ch. 1007, § 2; 1996, ch. 675, § 5.

4-7-304. Reporting of violations — Prosecutions.

The special unit created by this part shall encourage citizens to report violations of the Litter Control Law, compiled in title 39, chapter 14, part 5, and to prosecute offenders. If a citizen reports a violation of such law and declines to prosecute, the special unit shall notify the suspected offender by letter of the provisions of the Litter Control Law of 1971 and penalties for violation thereof.

Acts 1988, ch. 1007, § 2; 1996, ch. 675, § 6.

4-7-305. Training — Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of safety shall provide for appropriate training for members of the special unit created by this part. The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, to implement this part.

Acts 1988, ch. 1007, § 2.

4-7-306. Citizen cooperation.

The special unit created by this part shall encourage the citizens of this state to cooperate with the department in preventing and controlling violations of the Litter Control Law, compiled in title 39, chapter 14, part 5. Such unit shall develop programs to accomplish such cooperation, including, but not limited to, “litter watch” programs.

Acts 1988, ch. 1007, § 2; 1996, ch. 675, § 7.